Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-2502
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Expanded Learning Opportunity Grant Program Act is to promote academic achievement outside of school hours in high-need school districts.

Laws 2015, LB519, § 16.